Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 436 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Employee” means any person who renders services to an


employer, contractor, or any other entity and receives compensation


for those services, including full- and part-time paid employees,


temporary employees, contracted employees, and independent


contractors;


2. “Employer” means a person or entity of any size that obtains


services from a full- or part-time paid employee, temporary

Req. No. 2724 Page 1


employee, contracted employee, or independent contractor and hires


at least one employee for any compensation;


3. “Representative employee” means an employee in a leadership,


management, or legal position whose responsibility is to advise on,


oversee, or enforce organizational policies; and


4. “Workplace bullying” means unwelcome, degrading, and


dehumanizing conduct that is severe or pervasive enough to create a


work environment that a reasonable person would consider toxic,


hostile, or abusive. Workplace bullying may be perpetrated by one


or more persons. The term does not include petty slights or


annoyances. Factors to be considered in determining whether


workplace bullying exists include, but are not limited to, the


nature, frequency, and duration of the conduct and the context in


which the conduct occurs. Workplace bullying is found by a review


of the totality of the circumstances.


B. Employers and representative employees shall take reasonable


preventative and responsive measures to provide a safe work


environment free from workplace bullying. Such measures shall


include, but not be limited to:


1. Acknowledging and responding to complaints of bullying


within a reasonable time frame appropriate to the level of urgency;


2. Providing and executing a transparent, timely complaint


process that includes a legitimate, fair, fact-finding investigation


and the issuance of timely and accurate reports of findings;

Req. No. 2724 Page 2


3. Providing and executing a transparent disciplinary process


according to the severity of the offense within a reasonable time


frame, if applicable, including, but not limited to, remedial or


disciplinary action, including removal of supervisory duties, or


termination;


4. Maintaining accurate records of complaints, findings, and


disciplinary action taken;


5. Writing, distributing, posting, and otherwise providing a


written preventative policy against all forms of bullying, to


include an anti-retaliation policy and an identification and


description of all reporting methods, consistent with this section


and all other laws within ninety (90) days. Such policies shall be


distributed to employees on a regular basis; and


6. Training all employees on such preventative and reporting


policies.


C. It shall be unlawful for an employer or representative


employee to:


1. Mandate, offer, or use mediation or arbitration of a


workplace bullying complaint prior to the employee’s retaining of


counsel;


2. Mandate, offer, or use a nondisclosure or non-disparagement


agreement related to a workplace bullying complaint; and


3. Engage in an adverse employment action. An adverse


employment action occurs when an employee opposes an unlawful

Req. No. 2724 Page 3


employment practice or exercises a right under this section and is


then the target of forced resignation, termination, demotion,


unfavorable reassignment, failure to promote, disciplinary action,


reduction in compensation, constructive discharge, or similar


action.


D. 1. A violation or violations of any part of this act can be


enforced by a private right of action brought within three (3) years


of the last violation against an individual employee or employer in


violation of this act. Remedies shall include, but not be limited


to:


a. compensatory damages to include economic and


noneconomic,


b. punitive damages when a violation is extreme or


egregious,


c. injunctive relief where the court may enjoin the


defendant from engaging in unlawful employment


practice and may order any other relief deemed


appropriate including, but not limited to,


reinstatement of work, removal of the bullying


employee from the complainant’s work environment, or


removal of supervisory duties or termination of the


employee, and


d. restorative measures such as correction of


reputational damage including false statements made,

Req. No. 2724 Page 4


the disciplinary record, or performance evaluations of


the complainant, or public notification of the case


without disclosing the plaintiff’s name if desired by


the plaintiff.


2. The at-fault party shall pay the plaintiff’s reasonable


attorney fees and court costs. A prevailing employer shall not be


awarded fees and costs.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2724 BRC 1/12/2026 4:14:00 PM





























Req. No. 2724 Page 5